Utah statutes.
34A-6-201.   Duties of employers and employees.

(1)  Each employer shall furnish each of the employer's employees employment and a place of employment free from recognized hazards that are causing or are likely to cause death or physical harm to the employer's employees and comply with the standards promulgated under this chapter.

(2)  Each employee shall comply with the occupational safety and health standards, orders, and rules made under this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 375, 1997 General Session

